Illinois, session 104th, SB3413.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by adding Section 15.2 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/15.2 new)7    Sec. 15.2. The Director shall designate one or more 8individuals who are employees of the Department of Central 9Management Services to serve as Health Care Ombudspersons. 10Employees designated as Health Care Ombudspersons under this 11Section shall monitor and respond to members' email and 12telephone questions to the Department of Central Management 13Services regarding the benefits that are available under this 14Act and the eligibility of members for those benefits. Contact 15information for the Health Care Ombudspersons shall be 16included in any communications sent by the Department of 17Central Management Services regarding group health insurance 18benefits and shall be readily available on the Department's 19website. The primary goal of the Health Care Ombudspersons 20shall be to answer questions and generate information useful 21to participants in the program of group health benefits 22provided under this Act and, when possible, to resolve any 23issues between members and third-party providers of services   SB3413- 2 -LRB104 18769 BDA 32212 b1established under this Act.